Massachusetts, session 194th, H3666.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other general or special laws to the contrary, there 
shall be a commission to study the financial feasibility and department capability of providing 
rapid transit to the Towns of Arlington and Lexington by either extending the MBTA red line to 
include a stop in Arlington and Lexington and / or creating a Bus Rapid Transit (BRT) line from 
Alewife down Route 2 to the I-95 interchange with stops in Arlington and Lexington.  Both 
options shall be fully evaluated and a recommendation made upon the conclusion of the 
commissions' work.  The commission shall consist of 10 members: 3 members of the house of 
representatives, 1 of whom shall be appointed by the house minority leader; 3 members of the 
senate, 1 of whom shall be appointed by the senate minority leader; the secretary of the 
department of transportation or a designee; the chairman of the MBTA or a designee, and 2 
members to be appointed by the governor. 

of 2 12  SECTION 2. The commission shall file its findings and recommendations with the chairs 
of the joint committee on transportation no later than twelve months following the passage of 
this bill.